District of Columbia statutes.
28-4707

Repealed

Investment costs

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-187, § 1-12, 45 DCR 7802
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 4, 51 DCR 208

Most of the provisions of this chapter (§§ 28-4701 to 28-4712), are now codified at §§ 19-1309.01 to 19-1309.06, 19-1308.03, 19-1308.04, and 19-1308.05.

Uniform Law: These sections were based upon §§ 1-12 of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act.

1981 Ed., § 28-4701 — 28-4712.